Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Chapter 3 Limitation of Actions

Cross references. —

As to limitation on bringing proceedings to vacate or modify a judgment or order, see §

1-16-408

.

As to limitation for bringing action to revive a judgment, see §

1-16-503

.

For provision that recovery of damages in connection with issuance of writ of mandamus bars other actions, see §

1-30-113

.

As to limitation of action for damages sustained by an official whose office was usurped, see §

1-31-116

.

As to limitation upon time of bringing action of quo warranto against corporations or officers, see §

1-31-127

.

As to limitation upon time to bring action for damages caused by misconduct of officers resulting in forfeiture of corporate charter, see §

1-31-128

.

As to time for bringing suit against receiver on rejected claim, see §

1-33-110

.

As to limitation of action for wrongful death, see §

1-38-102

.

For provision making probate conclusive, see §

2-6-306

.

As to claims against estates, see §

2-7-701

et seq.

As to specified claims against state, see §

9-1-404

.

As to actions involving retirement board, see §

9-3-411

.

For limitation of claims against state for slaughter of diseased animals, see §

11-19-106

.

As to limitation of actions in connection with assessments for local improvements in cities and towns, see §

15-6-426

.

As to time for contesting rules on grounds of noncompliance with Administrative Procedure Act, see §

16-3-103

.

As to limitations for claims for damages in connection with establishment, alteration or vacation of proposed county highways, see §

24-3-112

.

As to prohibition of provision in life insurance policy limiting time within which an action at law or in equity may be commenced to less than three years after the cause of action shall accrue, see §

26-16-119

.

For limitations on filing of claims for worker's compensation, see §

27-14-503

.

As to limitation of actions with reference to mechanics' and builders' liens, see §

29-2-109

.

As to limitation of actions with reference to liens of threshermen, hay bailers and miners, see §

29-5-106

.

As to limitation of action on surety bonds of collection agencies, see §

33-11-109

.

As to limitation of actions to recover penalty from railroads for failure to burn fireguards, see §

37-9-302

.

As to limitation of actions with reference to recovery of additional penalties against public utilities, see §

37-12-212

.

As to limitation on actions to recover real property sold for taxes, see §

39-13-108

.

As to limitation of actions with reference to illegal tax levy, see §

39-13-109

.

As to limitation of actions to collect refunds of overpayment under use tax, see §

39-16-109

.

For limitation of actions alleging violations for multilevel and pyramid distributorship act, see §

40-3-123

.

For limitation of action alleging violation of consumer protection act, see §

40-12-109

.

As to limitation of actions to determine rights of joint users or claimants in connection with irrigation and drainage districts, see §

41-6-305

.

As to limitation of actions contesting organization of or assessments of irrigation and drainage districts, see §§

41-6-401

and

41-6-402

.

As to when action commences, see Rule 3, W.R.C.P.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Civil RICO After Sedima: An Exercise in Restraint,” see XXII Land & Water L. Rev. 153 (1987).

For comments, “Wyoming Tort Reform and the Medical Malpractice Insurance Crisis: A Second Opinion,” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 593 (1993).

For article, “Collecting Debt in Wyoming: The Fair Debt Collection Practices Act as a Trap for the Unwary,” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 731 (1996).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

9 Am. Jur. 2d Bankruptcy §§ 547 to 549; 51 Am. Jur. 2d Limitation of Actions § 1 et seq.

Which statute of limitations applies to efforts to compel arbitration of a dispute, 77 ALR4th 1071.

What statute of limitations applies to action to compel arbitration
pursuant to § 301 of Labor Management Relations Act (29 USC § 185),
96 ALR Fed 378.

Construction and application of provision of Fair Debt Collection
Practices Act relating to validation of debts (15 U.S.C.A. § 1692g),
150 ALR Fed 101.

54 C.J.S. Limitations of Actions § 1 et seq.

§ 1-3-101.
Applicability of provisions.

This chapter shall not
apply in the case of a continuing and subsisting trust, nor to an
action by a vendee of real property in possession thereof to obtain
a conveyance of it.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 27; R.S. 1887, § 2363; R.S. 1899, § 3446; C.S. 1910, § 4289; C.S. 1920, § 5558; R.S. 1931, § 89-401; C.S. 1945, § 3-401; W.S. 1957, § 1-11; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

A resulting trust is not a continuing and subsisting trust.

Herndon v. Hege, 528 P.2d 682,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 248

(Wyo. 1974).

Hence, the statute of limitations commences to run against enforcement of resulting trust from the time the act occurs which creates the trust. Herndon v. Hege, 528 P.2d 682,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 248

(Wyo. 1974).

If a cestui que trust is in possession, or if the trustee continues to acknowledge in some fashion the trust, or if the cestui has no knowledge that the trustee had taken title in his individual name, there are grounds for contending that the statute of limitations would be tolled while those conditions existed. Herndon v. Hege, 528 P.2d 682,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 248

(Wyo. 1974).

Applied

in

In re Estate of Sullivan, 506 P.2d 813,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 1973).

Law reviews. —

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part II,” VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1973).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Possession by mortgagee for limitation period before foreclosure as barring right of redemption, 7 ALR2d 1131.

Estoppel to rely on statute of limitations, 24 ALR2d 1413.

Applicability of statute of limitations to quo warranto proceedings involving corporations, 26 ALR2d 828.

Authority of agent to make payment on behalf of principal, as regards statute of limitations, 31 ALR2d 139.

Promissory estoppel as to statute of limitations, 48 ALR2d 1069.

Raising defense of statute by demurrer, equivalent motion to dismiss or by motion for judgment on pleadings, 61 ALR2d 300.

What statute of limitations governs creditor's action under bulk sales acts against purchaser, 61 ALR2d 935.

Statute of limitations as defense to action or proceeding for alimony or support of child allowed by decree or order of court, 70 ALR2d 1250.

Validity and applicability to existing causes of action not already barred of statute enlarging period of limitation, 79 ALR2d 1080.

Effect on accrual of cause of action against physician, surgeon or dentist for malpractice of patient's ignorance of extent of injuries or of his right to cause of action, 80 ALR2d 368.

General appearance as avoiding otherwise effective bar of statute of limitations, 82 ALR2d 1200.

Claim barred by limitations as within Bulk Sales Law, 85 ALR2d 1211.

Appointment of guardian as affecting running of statute of limitations against infant, 86 ALR2d 965.

Settlement negotiations as estopping reliance on statute of limitations, 39 ALR3d 127.

Insurer's failure to pay amount of admitted liability as precluding reliance on statute of limitations, 41 ALR3d 1111.

Agreement of parties as estopping reliance on statute of limitations, 43 ALR3d 756.

Promises to settle or perform as estopping reliance on statute of limitations, 44 ALR3d 482.

Plaintiff's diligence as affecting his right to have defendant estopped from pleading the statute of limitations, 44 ALR3d 760.

Fiduciary or confidential relationship as affecting estoppel to plead statute of limitations, 45 ALR3d 630.

Delay caused by other litigation as estopping reliance on statute of limitations, 45 ALR3d 703.

Tort claim against which period of statute of limitations has run as subject to setoff, counterclaim, cross bill or cross action in tort action arising out of same accident or incident, 72 ALR3d 1065.

Choice of law as to applicable statute of limitations in contract actions, 78 ALR3d 639.

Legal malpractice by permitting statutory time limitation to run against client's claim, 90 ALR3d 293.

Statute of limitations as bar to arbitration under agreement, 94 ALR3d 533.

Post-traumatic syndrome as tolling running of statute of limitations, 12 ALR5th 546.

Statute of limitations in civil actions for damages under the Racketeer Influence and Corrupt Organizations Act (RICO), 18 U.S.C. §§ 1961-1968, 156 ALR Fed 361.

§ 1-3-102.
When actions may be commenced.

Civil actions can only
be commenced within the periods prescribed in this chapter, after
the cause of action accrues, but where a different limitation is prescribed
by statute, that shall govern.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 29; R.S. 1887, § 2365; R.S. 1899, § 3450; C.S. 1910, § 4294; C.S. 1920, § 5563; R.S. 1931, § 89-405; C.S. 1945, § 3-405; W.S. 1957, § 1-12; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Contractually created shorter periods. —

Clearly, contractually created shorter periods are ‘within’ the limitation period. Nuhome Invs., LLC v. Weller, 2003 WY 171, 81 P.3d 940,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 207

(Wyo. 2003).

Ranch's action against corporation for failure to provide services
was time-barred. —

Finding that a ranch's action seeking damages resulting from a corporation's failure to provide engineering and surveying services was time-barred was appropriate because, whether Wyo. Stat. §

1-3-107

began to run on the date of the act, error or omission, or on the date the cause of action accrued, the lawsuit was untimely. The ranch's cause of action was time barred if not commenced within two years of the act, error or omission giving rise to the cause of action, or if, the two-year time limit started to run upon “accrual” of the cause of action, the ranch's claim was still time barred because the cause of action accrued on or before May 5, 2005.
Lucky Gate Ranch, L.L.C. v. Baker & Assocs., 2009 WY 69, 208 P.3d 57,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 2009).

Quoted

in

Badley v. Birchby, 487 P.2d 798,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 238

(Wyo. 1971).

Cited

in

National Tailoring Co. v. Scott, 65 Wyo. 64, 196 P.2d 387,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(1948); Cox v. City of Cheyenne, 2003 WY 146, 79 P.3d 500,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 2003).

Law reviews. —

See “Abstractor's Liability in Examination of Title,” 6 Wyo. L.J. 189.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Law requiring service of notice before bringing suit as affecting time from which statute of limitations begins to run, 3 ALR2d 711.

Limitation period as affected by requirement of notice or presentation of claim against governmental body, 3 ALR2d 711.

Bringing in new party after statute of limitations has run, 8 ALR2d 6.

Waiver or tolling of statute of limitations by executor or administrator, 8 ALR2d 660.

Statutory provisions regarding delivery of summons or other process for commencement of action to officer for service as equivalent of service of process for purpose of statute of limitation, 16 ALR2d 1079.

First and last day included or excluded for purposes of statute, 20 ALR2d 1249.

Statute of limitations as bar to arbitration under agreement, 37 ALR2d 1125.

Statement of account as reviving barred items, 51 ALR2d 331.

When statute of limitations starts to run against enforcement of constructive trust, 55 ALR2d 220.

Illness or death of party, counsel or witness as excuse for failure to timely prosecute action, 80 ALR2d 1399.

Appointment of committee for incompetent as affecting running of limitations against him, 86 ALR2d 965.

Timely suit to enforce policy as interrupting limitations against claimant's amended pleading to reform it, or vice versa, 92 ALR2d 168.

Acceptance of past due interest as waiver precluding acceleration which will institute limitations period, 97 ALR2d 997.

Time from which statute begins to run against action for wrongful death, 97 ALR2d 1151.

When statute of limitations or laches commences to run against action to set aside fraudulent conveyance or transfer in fraud of creditors, 100 ALR2d 1094.

Validity of contractual limitation of time for action, 6 ALR3d 1197.

Accrual of cause of action and tolling of limitation period of
§ 6 of the Federal Employers' Liability Act (45 U.S.C. § 56),
16 ALR3d 637.

Death before accrual of cause of action of one in whose favor it would have accrued as affecting running of limitation, 28 ALR3d 1141.

Liability in damages for preventing bringing of action before its being barred by statute of limitations, 33 ALR3d 1077.

What constitutes “publication” of libel in order to start running of period of limitations, 42 ALR3d 807.

Promises or attempts by seller to repair goods as tolling statute of limitations for breach of warranty, 68 ALR3d 1277.

Effect of injured employee's proceeding for workmen's compensation benefits on running of statute of limitations governing action for personal injury arising from same incident, 71 ALR3d 849.

Owner's surveying of land as entry thereon tolling running of statute of limitations for purposes of adverse possession, 76 ALR3d 1202.

Imprisonment of party to civil action as tolling statute of limitations, 77 ALR3d 735.

When statute of limitations begins to run as to cause of action for development of latent industrial or occupational disease, 1 ALR4th 117.

What statute of limitations governs damage action against attorney for malpractice, 2 ALR4th 284.

What statute of limitations governs action arising out of transaction consummated by use of credit card, 2 ALR4th 677.

What statute of limitations governs physician's action for wrongful denial of hospital privileges, 3 ALR4th 1214.

When statute of limitations begins to run as to cause of action for nuisance based on air pollution, 19 ALR4th 456.

Time when cause of action accrues for civil action under state antitrust, monopoly or restraint of trade statutes, 90 ALR4th 1102.

Insurer's waiver of defense of statute of limitations, 104 ALR5th 331.

§ 1-3-103.
Recovery of real property; generally.

An action for the recovery
of the title or possession of lands, tenements or hereditaments can
only be brought within ten (10) years after the cause of such action
accrues.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 30; R.S. 1887, § 2366; R.S. 1899, § 3451; C.S. 1910, § 4295; C.S. 1920, § 5564; R.S. 1931, § 89-406; C.S. 1945, § 3-501; W.S. 1957, § 1-13; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

I. General Consideration.

II. Adverse Possession.

A. In General.

B. Elements.

§ 1-3-104.
Recovery of real property; legal disability.

Any person entitled to
bring an action for the recovery of real property who is under any
legal disability when the cause of action accrues may bring his action
within ten (10) years after the disability is removed.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 31; R.S. 1887, § 2367; R.S. 1899, § 3452; C.S. 1910, § 4296; C.S. 1920, § 5565; R.S. 1931, § 89-407; C.S. 1945, § 3-502; W.S. 1957, § 1-14; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Cross references. —

For provision concerning minors as parties to actions, see §

1-1-102

.

For provision reserving rights of minors in judgments or orders, see §

1-16-101

.

For age of majority, see §

14-1-101

.

Cited

in

Hill v. Mayall, 886 P.2d 1188,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 161

(Wyo. 1994); Sullivan v. Bailiff, 867 F. Supp. 992, 1994 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 16706 (D. Wyo. 1994).

Law reviews. —

See comment, “Remedial Title Legislation for Wyoming,” VII Land & Water L. Rev. 561 (1972).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Tolling of state statute of limitations in favor of one commencing action despite existing disability, 30 ALR4th 1092.

Post-traumatic syndrome as tolling running of statute of limitations, 12 ALR5th 546.

§ 1-3-105.
Actions other than recovery of real property.

Civil actions other than for the recovery of real property can only be brought within the following periods after the cause of action accrues:

Within ten (10) years, an action upon a specialty or any contract, agreement or promise in writing;

Within eight (8) years, an action:

Upon a contract not in writing, either express or implied; or

Upon a liability created by statute other than a forfeiture or penalty.

Within five (5) years after the debtor establishes residence in Wyoming, an action on a foreign claim, judgment or contract, express or implied, contracted or incurred and accrued before the debtor became a resident of Wyoming;

Within four (4) years, an action for:

Trespass upon real property;

The recovery of personal property or for taking, detaining or injuring personal property;

An injury to the rights of the plaintiff, not arising on contract and not herein enumerated; and

For relief on the ground of fraud.

Within one (1) year, an action for:

Libel or slander;

Assault or battery not including sexual assault;

Malicious prosecution or false imprisonment; or

Upon a statute for a penalty or forfeiture, except that if a different limitation is prescribed in the statute by which the remedy is given the action shall be brought within the period prescribed by the statute.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, a civil action based upon sexual assault as defined by W.S. 6-2-301(a)(v) against a minor may be brought within the later of:

Eight (8) years after the minor’s eighteenth birthday; or

Three (3) years after the discovery.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, §§ 32-36; R.S. 1887, §§ 2368-2372; Laws 1890-91, ch. 72, § 1; R.S. 1899, §§ 3453-3457; C.S. 1910, §§ 4297-4301; Laws 1911, ch. 63, § 1; C.S. 1920, §§ 5566-5570; Laws 1931, ch. 73, §§ 83, 84; R.S. 1931, §§ 89-408 to 89-412; C.S. 1945, §§ 3-503 to 3-507; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-15 to 1-19; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; 1993, ch. 215, § 1.

§ 1-3-106.
When certain causes of action accrue.

A cause of action for
the wrongful taking of personal property is not deemed to have accrued
until the wrongdoer is discovered. A cause of action on the ground
of fraud is not deemed to have accrued until the discovery of the
fraud.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 35; R.S. 1887, § 2371; R.S. 1899, § 3456; C.S. 1910, § 4300; C.S. 1920, § 5569; R.S. 1931, § 49-411; C.S. 1945, § 3-506; W.S. 1957, § 1-18; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Active concealment. —

Client's efforts to obtain information were met with active concealment by the stockbroker and others, and under these circumstances, the evidence did not support dismissal of the case on the basis of the statute of limitations. Erdelyi v. Lott, 2014 WY 48, 326 P.3d 165,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 51

(Wyo. 2014).

Negligence. —

If a jury finds that a claimant knew or could have discovered the fraud more than four years before filing the action, the perpetrator of the fraud is relieved from any liability, and thus any negligence of the claimant in not discovering and timely pursuing a fraud claim is addressed in the statute, and there is no need for a separate instruction allowing a jury to compare a claimant's negligence or comparative fault with the willful act of the perpetrator in a fraud case; on remand, the jury was not to be instructed on comparative fault as between the client and the stockbroker. Erdelyi v. Lott, 2014 WY 48, 326 P.3d 165,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 51

(Wyo. 2014).

When statute runs in fraud cases. —

The statute begins to run in fraud cases when there is discovery by the aggrieved party of the facts constituting the fraud. Mason v. Laramie Rivers Co., 490 P.2d 1062,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 265

(Wyo. 1971).

Fraud and conversion. —

In a case
relating to the theft and resale of beer, the discovery rule applied
to the fraud and conversion statutes of limitation; however, whether
the explanations for a delay in discovery were credible and reasonably
diligent were questions for the jury. The parties disputed what steps
were necessary to determine the cause of the beer losses and to determine
who was involved in those losses. Robert L. Kroenlein Trust v. Kirchhefer, 2015 WY 127, 357 P.3d 1118,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 2015).

Words “until the discovery of the fraud”

mean from the time the fraud was known or could have been discovered in the exercise of reasonable diligence. They do not necessarily mean until the party complaining had actual notice of the fraud alleged to have been committed. Mason v. Laramie Rivers Co., 490 P.2d 1062,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 265

(Wyo. 1971); Taylor v. Estate of Taylor, 719 P.2d 234,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 557

(Wyo. 1986).

Actual knowledge of fraud will be inferred

if the aggrieved party, by the exercise of due diligence, could have discovered it. Mason v. Laramie Rivers Co., 490 P.2d 1062,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 265

(Wyo. 1971).

In action against former husband for recovery of overriding oil and gas royalties

which were due to the former wife by virtue of an assignment of the same by the husband, as ordered in a divorce decree, but which were not remitted to her, the husband was guilty of conversion, so, therefore, the four-year limitation period of § 1-3-105(a)(iv)(B) was applicable. Because this failure to remit was a recurring tort involving a series of tortious acts, each of which formed the basis of a separate claim, and each of which accrued when the husband, on different occasions throughout the years, received royalties and made no remittances, and the wife discovered, or could have discovered, that she was not receiving her royalty share, the wife could recover for her share of royalties received but not remitted by the husband within four years preceding the filing of her action. As to the rest, i.e., the royalties received but not remitted beyond this four-year period, she was barred. Young v. Young, 709 P.2d 1254,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 628

(Wyo. 1985).

Action for conversion of road grader. —

A cause of action for conversion did not accrue on the date that the plaintiff first attempted to recover a road grader from the defendant, but on the later date that the defendant lied to the plaintiff and falsely reported that the grader was no longer on his property. Cross v. Berg Lumber Co., 7 P.3d 922,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 167

(Wyo. 2000), reh'g denied,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 179

(Wyo. Aug. 8, 2000).

Cited

in

Richardson Assocs. v. Lincoln-Devore, Inc., 806 P.2d 790,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1991).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Effect of lack of knowledge of product's defect on running of statute of limitations in products liability claim, 91 ALR3d 991.

What statute of limitations governs damage action against attorney for malpractice, 2 ALR4th 284.

What statute of limitations governs physician's action for wrongful denial of hospital privileges, 3 ALR4th 1214.

Insurance agents or brokers as professionals or nonprofessionals for purposes of malpractice statutes of limitations, 121 ALR 5th 365.

Fraudulent concealment, so as to toll statute of limitations, as presenting common question of proof in antitrust class action, 70 ALR Fed 498.

When does state statute of limitations begin to run in civil action for securities fraud under § 10(b) of Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 USC § 78j(b)), 71 ALR Fed 257.

Application of fraudulent concealment doctrine to statute of limitations
in antitrust case (15 USC § 15b),
72 ALR Fed 430.

When does statute of limitations begin to run in action under False
Claims Act (31 USCS §§ 3729 -3733),
139 ALR Fed 645.

What constitutes “inquiry notice” sufficient to commence running of statute of limitations in securities fraud action — Post-Lampf cases, 148 ALR Fed 629.